Hawaii statutes.
§438-3 Board of barbering and cosmetology.
(a) There shall be a state board of barbering and cosmetology consisting of
seven members who shall be appointed and may be removed by the governor. The
members shall be residents of the State, of which:

(1) Two members shall be barbers licensed under
chapter 438 who have been licensed to practice for at least five years and have
been actively and continuously engaged as licensees for that period;

(2) Two members shall be beauty operators licensed
under chapter 439, who have been licensed to practice for at least five years
and have been actively and continuously engaged as licensees for that period;
and

(3) Three shall be public members.

Each member shall serve for a term of four years,
and until the member's successor is appointed and qualified.

(b) Board members affiliated with any school
teaching any of the classified occupations shall disclose that affiliation and
at all times shall adhere to chapter 84 and the interpretations of that chapter
by the state ethics commission. [L 1947, c 194, §3; RL 1955, §58-3; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §5; HRS §438-3; am L 1978, c 208, §1; am L 1983, c 240, §1; am L
1992, c 202, §35; am L 1993, c 322, §2; am L 1997, c 87, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next